Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
PART 3
PRESERVATION OF COMMERCIAL MINERAL DEPOSITS

34-1-301. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that:

The state's commercial mineral deposits are essential to the state's economy;

The populous counties of the state face a critical shortage of such deposits;

Such deposits should be extracted according to a rational plan, calculated to avoid waste of such deposits and cause the least practicable disruption of the ecology and quality of life of the citizens of the populous counties of the state.

The general assembly further declares that, for the reasons stated in subsection (1) of this section, the regulation of commercial mineral deposits, the preservation of access to and extraction of such deposits, and the development of a rational plan for extraction of such deposits are matters of concern in the populous counties of the state. It is the intention of the general assembly that the provisions of this part 3 have full force and effect throughout such populous counties, including, but not limited to, the city and county of Denver and any other home rule city or town within each such populous county but shall have no application outside such populous counties.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 1046, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-36-1.

34-1-302. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Commercial mineral deposit" means a natural mineral deposit of limestone used for construction purposes, coal, sand, gravel, and quarry aggregate, for which extraction by an extractor is or will be commercially feasible and regarding which it can be demonstrated by geologic, mineralogic, or other scientific data that such deposit has significant economic or strategic value to the area, state, or nation.

"Extractor" means any individual, partnership, association, or corporation which extracts commercial mineral deposits for use in the business of selling such deposits or for use in another business owned by the extractor or any department or division of federal, state, county, or municipal government which extracts such deposits.

"Populous county or populous counties of the state" means any county or city and county having a population of sixty-five thousand inhabitants or more according to the latest federal decennial census.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 1047, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-36-2.

34-1-303. Geological survey to make study.

After July 1, 1973, the Colorado geological survey shall contract for a study of the commercial mineral deposits in the populous counties of the state in order to identify and locate such deposits. Such study shall be of sand, gravel, and quarry aggregate, and shall be completed on or before July 1, 1974, and shall include a map or maps of the state showing such commercial mineral deposits, copies of which may be generally circulated. Any commercial mineral deposits discovered subsequent to July 1, 1974, may be, upon discovery, included in such study.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 1047, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-36-3.

34-1-304. Master plan for extraction.

The county planning commission for unincorporated areas and for cities and towns having no planning commission or the planning commission for each city and county, city, or town, within each populous county of the state, shall, with the aid of the maps from the study conducted pursuant to section 34-1-303, conduct a study of the commercial mineral deposits located within its jurisdiction and develop a master plan for the extraction of such deposits, which plan shall consist of text and maps. In developing the master plan, the planning commission shall consider, among others, the following factors:

Any system adopted by the Colorado geological survey grading commercial mineral deposits according to such factors as magnitude of the deposit and time of availability for and feasibility of extraction of a deposit;

The potential for effective multiple sequential use which would result in the optimum benefit to the landowner, neighboring residents, and the community as a whole;

The development or preservation of land to enhance development of physically attractive surroundings compatible with the surrounding area;

The quality of life of the residents in and around areas which contain commercial mineral deposits;

Other master plans of the county, city and county, city, or town;

Maximization of extraction of commercial mineral deposits;

The ability to reclaim an area pursuant to the provisions of article 32 of this title; and

The ability to reclaim an area owned by any county, city and county, city, town, or other governmental authority or proposed, pursuant to an adopted plan, to be used for public purposes by such a governmental authority consistent with such proposed use.

A planning commission shall cooperate with the planning commissions of contiguous areas and the mined land reclamation board created by section 34-32-105 in conducting the study and developing the master plan for extraction.

A county planning commission shall certify its master plan for extraction to the board of county commissioners or the governing body of the city or town where the county planning commission is acting in lieu of a city or town planning commission. A planning commission in any city and county, city, or town shall certify its master plan for extraction to the governing body of such city and county, city, or town.

After receiving the certification of such master plan and before adoption of such plan, the board of county commissioners or governing body of a city and county, city, or town shall hold a public hearing thereon, and at least thirty days' notice of the time and place of such hearing shall be given by one publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county, city and county, city, or town. Such notice shall state the place at which the text and maps so certified may be examined.

The board of county commissioners or governing body of a city and county, city, or town may, after such public hearing, adopt the plan, revise the plan with the advice of the planning commission and adopt it, or return the plan to the planning commission for further study and rehearing before adoption, but, in any case, a master plan for extraction of commercial mineral deposits shall be adopted for the unincorporated territory and any city and county, city, or town in each populous county of the state on or before July 1, 1975.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 1047, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-36-4.

L. 75:

(1)(h) added, p. 1336, § 1, effective June 29.

L. 77:

(2) amended, p. 289, § 67, effective June 29.

Cross references:

For establishment and functions of a county planning commission, see § 30-28-133.

34-1-305. Preservation of commercial mineral deposits for extraction.

After July 1, 1973, no board of county commissioners, governing body of any city and county, city, or town, or other governmental authority which has control over zoning shall, by zoning, rezoning, granting a variance, or other official action or inaction, permit the use of any area known to contain a commercial mineral deposit in a manner which would interfere with the present or future extraction of such deposit by an extractor.

After adoption of a master plan for extraction for an area under its jurisdiction, no board of county commissioners, governing body of any city and county, city, or town, or other governmental authority which has control over zoning shall, by zoning, rezoning, granting a variance, or other official action or inaction, permit the use of any area containing a commercial mineral deposit in a manner which would interfere with the present or future extraction of such deposit by an extractor.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a board of county commissioners, a governing body of any city and county, city, or town, or any other governmental authority which has control over zoning from zoning or rezoning land to permit a certain use, if said use does not permit erection of permanent structures upon, or otherwise permanently preclude the extraction of commercial mineral deposits by an extractor from, land subject to said use.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a board of county commissioners, a governing body of any city and county, city, or town, or other governmental authority which has control over zoning from zoning for agricultural use, only, land not otherwise zoned on July 1, 1973.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a use of zoned land permissible under the zoning governing such land on July 1, 1973.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a board of county commissioners, a governing body of any city and county, city, or town, or any other governmental authority from acquiring property known to contain a commercial mineral deposit and using said property for a public purpose; except that such use shall not permit erection of permanent structures which would preclude permanently the extraction of commercial mineral deposits.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 1048, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 92-36-5.

L. 75:

(6) added, p. 1336, § 2, effective June 29.